District of Columbia statutes.
1-634.01

Repealed

Annual report.

Repealed.

June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(aa), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-635.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-364.1.
Historical citations: Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3401, 25 DCR 5740; Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(bb), 33 DCR 7241.